public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
alastar/A
ralegrar/A
amar/A
inanelar/A
arđentar/A
arguir/A
artikolar/A
aselerar/A
dexautorar/A
inaxoƚar/A
xbagasar/A
xbakanar/A
baƚansar/A
xbalinar/A
inbalsemar/A
xbandir/A
baokar/A
barbaɉar/A
inbarlukar/A
bàter/A
rebatixar/A
inbaular/A
baxukiar/A
inbeƚetar/A
xberxeƚar/A
xbevasar/A
xbiansar/A
abinar/A
dexbirar/A
bixegolar/A
sobójer/A
bokiđar/A
xboƚoñar/A
bonbardar/A
abordar/A
exborsar/A
botixar/A
inbosoƚar/A
inbragesar/A
brandir/A
xbrasoƚar/A
brikonar/A
inbroɉar/A
inbronkar/A
brustolar/A
inbuƚir/A
rebutar/A
cakolar/A
scatar/A
aparcèñer/A
mancéñer/A
cincinar/A
copar/A
dameɉar/A
dekiarar/A
deŧimar/A
xdindoƚar/A
dobar/A
doloxar/A
kondonar/A
indormensar/A
indresar/A
introdúxer/A
đaltronar/A
denerar/A
xogoƚar/A
indónxer/A
dovar/A
xuƚar/A
èrđer/A
reelèder/A
erpegar/A
exalar/A
desfar/A
fadegar/A
faƚiar/A
fameɉarixar/A
desfarinar/A
faŧendar/A
anplifegar/A
speŧifegar/A
fenestrar/A
sferdir/A
fetonar/A
sfiapir/A
refifar/A
strafiƚar/A
fiokar/A
firmar/A
subafitar/A
sfogar/A
folexar/A
sforbexar/A
informigar/A
straforŧar/A
sfrakasar/A
fransexar/A
fraternixar/A
fregolar/A
sfríđer/A
frontar/A
ŧentrifugar/A
furbir/A
gabar/A
galedar/A
gaƚopar/A
xgangoƚir/A
ingarbeƚar/A
xgarofolar/A
gendoliđar/A
ingobar/A
gorar/A
dexgradir/A
grandeđar/A
ingrapeɉar/A
dexgravar/A
xgremir/A
griliar/A
dexgritoƚir/A
grondar/A
xgruñar/A
xguaƚivar/A
xguinsar/A
ilkamar/A
infilsar/A
malinpresionar/A
interpretar/A
ipotiđar/A
inɉandoƚir/A
xɉaŧar/A
ɉeƚomarar/A
dexɉonfar/A
xjoŧar/A
ɉugular/A
akàder/A
kaiđar/A
kaƚibrar/A
kalmar/A
skalsar/A
kanar/A
kànđer/A
skanpanidar/A
kañar/A
kapitoƚar/A
karakolar/A
skargar/A
skarosar/A
kartidar/A
inkasteƚar/A
inkatifar/A
deskaŧar/A
prekavar/A
kavilar/A
koar/A
koɉonbarar/A
deskoƚar/A
inkolorir/A
komensiar/A
kondir/A
deskonpañar/A
kontenplar/A
deskonsar/A
dekórer/A
deskordar/A
inkordelar/A
inkorporar/A
kostipar/A
kovèrđer/A
rekréder/A
krexemar/A
skrokoƚar/A
krostolixar/A
skuadrar/A
intrakuerar/A
inkuirar/A
skulasar/A
skurŧar/A
lakoniđar/A
xlanguir/A
ƚaoratar/A
reƚasar/A
laurear/A
lèder/A
ƚegrar/A
ƚestir/A
aleviar/A
skuiƚibrar/A
ƚikuidar/A
delirar/A
lodar/A
xlonbar/A
aƚosar/A
iƚuminar/A
reƚúxer/A
magonar/A
xmalisiar/A
manestrar/A
mantexar/A
marangonar/A
marɉar/A
xmarŧir/A
xmaskerar/A
matridar/A
inmaxarir/A
inframexar/A
meƚar/A
dementir/A
meritar/A
malméter/A
mietar/A
mirar/A
moduƚar/A
molar/A
xmojar/A
soramontar/A
inmorbar/A
mormorar/A
moŧar/A
tramudarar/A
dexmurar/A
inmutriar/A
renàser/A
negar/A
nevegar/A
nodrigar/A
renonŧiar/A
nuvolar/A
ñiñolar/A
subodorar/A
olir/A
ondexar/A
ontoƚar/A
organar/A
orsar/A
pacar/A
inpadronir/A
inpajetar/A
paƚernar/A
spalisar/A
panar/A
spanpanar/A
spapoƚar/A
skonparir/A
departir/A
inparŧialidar/A
pasixar/A
pastrosar/A
despasar/A
spaventar/A
rapegar/A
traƚelar/A
inpelumar/A
depénđer/A
penoƚar/A
speocar/A
spernacar/A
petar/A
petoƚar/A
speŧegar/A
pianar/A
pianiđar/A
inpiegar/A
pilotar/A
inpionbar/A
inpironar/A
inpiŧar/A
pixolar/A
poƚakar/A
despolverar/A
deskonpóner/A
inponarar/A
ponteƚar/A
strapónxer/A
inportar/A
postilar/A
povoƚar/A
presostatar/A
raprexentar/A
pronostegar/A
publegar/A
despupilar/A
puteƚar/A
eradegar/A
rajonar/A
randar/A
rastelar/A
recedar/A
regaƚar/A
dexrenar/A
rexiduar/A
riñar/A
rivar/A
roejar/A
aroƚar/A
ronkixar/A
rosteƚar/A
ruxenir/A
ruimar/A
sakañar/A
salmistrar/A
sasinar/A
scopiđar/A
insèguer/A
deseƚexar/A
inseñorar/A
sfriđegar/A
sincerar/A
skalvar/A
reskatar/A
skónder/A
skuamar/A
insoƚentar/A
sopoxar/A
spanar/A
inspesar/A
spiritar/A
malstar/A
kontrastanpar/A
stiƚar/A
instokar/A
astrénder/A
strukoƚar/A
suefar/A
susar/A
takonar/A
tariđar/A
intavolar/A
tenperar/A
manteñir/A
aterar/A
tindonar/A
intolar/A
torcar/A
retòrxer/A
tragar/A
retratar/A
tresar/A
tronbixar/A
ŧakar/A
ŧavatar/A
konŧentrar/A
insernir/A
ŧikolar/A
ŧiolar/A
ŧokolar/A
uɉar/A
stravakar/A
xvanpoƚar/A
travéder/A
vendemar/A
vèñer/A
xverxeƚar/A
avertir/A
invidar/A
vitaƚixar/A
revokar/A
involtolar/A
xàser/A
inxeñatolar/A
xmeriliar/A
emoŧionar/A
rexúmer/A
fonsionar/A
sostantivar/A
inkontentar/A
maƚandar/A
xbrindeƚar/A
xmagrir/A
elíder/A
kospetidar/A
berlina/A	po:noun
